Utah statutes.
58-41-4.   Exemptions from chapter.
(1)  In addition to the exemptions from licensure in Section 58-1-307, the
following persons may engage in the practice of speech-language pathology and
audiology subject to the stated circumstances and limitations without being
licensed under this chapter:
(a)  a qualified person licensed in this state under any law existing in this
state prior to May 13, 1975, from engaging in the profession for which he is
licensed;
(b)  a medical doctor, physician, or surgeon licensed in this state, from
engaging in his specialty in the practice of medicine;
(c)  a hearing aid dealer or salesman from selling, fitting, adjusting, and
repairing hearing aids, and conducting hearing tests solely for that purpose.
However, a hearing aid dealer may not conduct audiologic testing on persons
under the age of 18 years except under the direct supervision of an
audiologist licensed under this chapter;
(d)  a person who has obtained a valid and current credential issued by the
Utah State Office of Education while performing specifically the functions of
a speech-language pathologist or audiologist, in no way in his own interest,
solely within the confines of and under the direction and jurisdiction of and
only in the academic interest of the schools by which employed in this state;
(e)  a person employed as a speech-language pathologist or audiologist by
federal government agencies or subdivisions or, prior to July 1, 1989, by
state or local government agencies or subdivisions, while specifically
performing speech-language pathology or audiology services in no way in his
own interest, solely within the confines of and under the direction and
jurisdiction of and in the specific interest of that agency or subdivision;
(f)  a person identified in Subsections (1)(d) and (e) may offer lectures for
a fee, or monetary or other compensation, without being licensed; however,
such person may elect to be subject to the requirements of this chapter;
(g)  a person employed by accredited colleges or universities as a speech-
language pathologist or audiologist from performing the services or functions
described in this chapter when they are:
(i)  performed solely as an assigned teaching function of employment;
(ii)  solely in academic interest and pursuit as a function of that
employment;
(iii)  in no way for their own interest; and
(iv)  provided for no fee, monetary or otherwise, other than their agreed
institutional salary;
(h)  a person pursuing a course of study leading to a degree in speech-
language pathology or audiology while enrolled in an accredited college or
university, provided those activities constitute an assigned, directed, and
supervised part of his curricular study, and in no other interest, and that
all examinations, tests, histories, charts, progress notes, reports,
correspondence, and all documents and records which he produces be identified
clearly as having been conducted and prepared by a student in training and
that such a person is obviously identified and designated by appropriate title
clearly indicating the training status and provided that he does not hold
himself out directly or indirectly as being qualified to practice
independently;
(i)  a person trained in elementary audiometry and qualified to perform basic
audiometric tests while employed by a licensed medical doctor to perform
solely for him while under his direct supervision, the elementary conventional
audiometric tests of air conduction screening, air conduction threshold
testing, and tympanometry;
(j)  a person while performing as a speech-language pathologist or audiologist
for the purpose of obtaining required professional experience under the
provisions of this chapter, if he meets all training requirements and is
professionally responsible to and under the supervision of a speech-language
pathologist or audiologist who holds the CCC or a state license in speech-
language pathology or audiology.  This provision is applicable only during the
time that person is obtaining the required professional experience;
(k)  a corporation, partnership, trust, association, group practice, or like
organization engaging in speech-language pathology or audiology services
without certification or license, if it acts only through employees or
consists only of persons who are licensed under this chapter;
(l)  performance of speech-language pathology or audiology services in this
state by a speech-language pathologist or audiologist who is not a resident of
this state and is not licensed under this chapter if those services are
performed for no more than one month in any calendar year in association with
a speech-language pathologist or audiologist licensed under this chapter, and
if that person meets the qualifications and requirements for application for
licensure described in Section 58-41-5; and
(m)  a person certified under Title 53A, State System of Public Education, as
a teacher of the deaf, from providing the services or performing the functions
he is certified to perform.
(2)  No person is exempt from the requirements of this chapter who performs or
provides any services as a speech-language pathologist or audiologist for
which a fee, salary, bonus, gratuity, or compensation of any kind paid by the
recipient of the service; or who engages any part of his professional work for
a fee practicing in conjunction with, by permission of, or apart from his
position of employment as speech-language pathologist or audiologist in any
branch or subdivision of local, state, or federal government or as otherwise
identified in this section.
